If my last message (https://pastebin.com/z49g6KKe) seemed a little weirder than usual, a heads up: it only gets weirder from here on out.

First, some corrections:

I said "the Constitutionality of Trump's travel-ban is an important part of what looks like the strongest case for Trump's impeachment," but as Trump points out, his revised travel ban is "watered down" and "politically correct," so perhaps not a Muslim ban:


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/871674214356484096
	People, the lawyers and the courts can call it whatever they want, but I am calling it what we need and what it is, a TRAVEL BAN!


https://twitter.com/realDonaldTrump/status/871677472202477568
	The Justice Dept. should have stayed with the original Travel Ban, not the watered down, politically correct version they submitted to S.C.


http://www.nbcbayarea.com/news/politics/Appeals-Court-Taking-up-Revised-Trump-Travel-Ban-421582123.html
	A challenge to President Donald Trump's revised travel ban appears to hinge on whether a federal appeals court agrees that the Republican's past anti-Muslim statements can be used against him.

	...The new version made it clear the 90-day ban covering those six countries doesn't apply to those who already have valid visas. It removed language that would give priority to religious minorities and erased Iraq from the list of banned countries.


Still, Trump promised a "Muslim ban" during his campaign. and Giuliani said Trump was trying to find a way to implement a Muslim ban legally. So it's possible Trump is trying to side-step the Constitution again with his revised ban. 

I said "The American public might reasonably expect there is exist a smoking gun showing some kind of direct and illegal link between Trump and Putin, like a recording of him conspiring with Putin or a secret back-channel," but this had a typo in it. A back-channel isn't illegal.

I focused a lot on Scavino and Hicks as possible agents of influence over Trump, but this isn't to say they have to be the *only* suspicious people trying to get to his head. Here is a really good piece on how Trump advisors Stephen Miller, Jeff Sessions, and Steve Bannon are all caught up in the same network of of weird propaganda-spreading law-skirting ultra-right-wing charities:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/investigations/how-a-shadow-universe-of-charities-joined-with-political-warriors-to-fuel-trumps-rise/2017/06/03/ff5626ac-3a77-11e7-a058-ddbb23c75d82_story.html?hpid=hp_hp-top-table-main_charitynetwork-840pm%3Ahomepage%2Fstory


What's important about Scavino and Hicks is that they have Trump's ear and his trust. Scavino and Hicks in particular are easier to tie to Russia, since they are in charge of Trump's message, but Schiller and Kushner have Trump's trust too:


http://www.cnn.com/2017/04/16/politics/donald-trump-keith-schiller-security/
	Trump's management style, advisers say, has also long been collaborative, with the President regularly asking people close to him for their views, even if they have no expertise in the field. Schiller is often that person next to the President and regularly offers his thoughts, friends say. And in a White House filled with new hired hands and paid advisers, his relationship with Trump has something that only time could cement: Trust.

	That trust is apparent to anyone who interacts with Trump and Schiller. In fact, former campaign aides described how many in Trump's orbit craved Schiller's approval, knowing that it would lead to Trump's backing.

	..."He was always the man in charge of Donald Trump's security, but during the years of service, he also became a confidant, and it is almost like neither realized it," said a former Trump Organization employee. "What they have left is a really strong personal bond."


http://www.cnn.com/2016/04/29/politics/donald-trump-tweets-daniel-scavino/index.html
	Because he's spent so much time with Trump over the years, Scavino can seamlessly channel him on social media if need be.

	"I know Mr. Trump's message very clearly, being around him 18 hours a day, traveling around the country," he said.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/in-fathers-scandal-the-genesis-of-jared-kushners-unflinching-loyalty/2016/11/27/1e9497ba-b378-11e6-840f-e3ebab6bcdd3_story.html
	Kushner would often sit with Trump on the president-elect’s private plane, a Boeing 757 outfitted with cream leather couches, gold seat buckles and a big-screen television. He would quietly turn to Trump as they both read between stops — Trump rifling through a pile of printed articles, Kushner on his laptop or phone. They’d keep an eye on Fox News Channel, with Kushner whispering tidbits of information and the latest about the family.


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/06/26/style/hope-hicks-donald-trump.html
	Mostly, however, Ms. Hicks is a friendly, if disciplined, presence — Southern charm by way of Fairfield County. (Upon accompanying Mr. Trump to Scotland this past week, she told a reporter wryly, “I don’t do well in plaid.”) And she is unfailingly deferential to her employer, whom she refers to only as “Mr. Trump” or “sir.”

	He seems to appreciate it. “I’m lucky to have her,” Mr. Trump said in a telephone interview on Thursday. “She’s got very good judgment. She will often give advice, and she’ll do it in a very low-key manner, so it doesn’t necessarily come in the form of advice. But it’s delivered very nicely.”


Scavino, Hicks, and Schiller (and arguably Kushner) have a lot more power than people give them credit for. They can try to influence Trump in subtle (and plausibly deniable) ways: Trump says himself "[Hicks] will often give advice, and she’ll do it in a very low-key manner, so it doesn’t necessarily come in the form of advice." Controlling access to Trump alone is a huge deal--reportedly, Hicks alone gets to decide which journalists get to talk to Trump, and Trump relies on Schiller's advice on who to trust. If the people Trump trusts and relies on the most tell Trump he should listen to Steve Bannon, for example, then Bannon's ideas will show up in U.S. policy. This is the power of having influence with a U.S. President.

Not surprisingly then, Russian spies have been "infiltrating U.S. policymaking circles" in hopes of befriending Americans who might one day be influential:


http://articles.latimes.com/2011/oct/31/nation/la-na-russian-spies-20111101
	Russian spies were succeeding, FBI official says

	The 10 sleeper agents exposed in 2010 were reportedly succeeding in efforts to rise in American society and gain connections to policymakers. Newly released documents detail the investigation.

    ...The agents, whom the U.S. sent to Russia in July 2010 in the largest spy swap since the Cold War, are not accused of stealing any U.S. secrets. But they were more dangerous than commonly believed, C. Frank Figliuzzi, FBI assistant director for counterintelligence, said in an interview.

    They were "the cream of the crop" of trained Russian intelligence agents, he said, and they were sent here to blend in and befriend American policymakers. They were succeeding, Figliuzzi said.

    "Several were getting close to high-ranking officials," he said. One had gone to work for a confidant of a U.S. Cabinet member, he added, declining to offer details.


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/29/AR2010062905401.html
	But beneath the carefully constructed exteriors, there were indications of what authorities say was the suspects' real purpose in the United States: to infiltrate academic, policymaking and government-connected circles. Semenko, for example, often attended events sponsored by embassies and nongovernmental organizations.

	Donald Howard Heathfield, an international business consultant who lived with his "wife," Tracey Lee Ann Foley, and their two teenage sons in Cambridge, Mass., sought membership in more than 30 professional, academic and business associations -- including one linked to the Department of Homeland Security, according to his page on LinkedIn. 


https://www.fbi.gov/news/stories/operation-ghost-stories-inside-the-russian-spy-case
	October 31, 2011

	The arrests of 10 Russian spies last year provided a chilling reminder that espionage on U.S. soil did not disappear when the Cold War ended. The highly publicized case also offered a rare glimpse into the sensitive world of counterintelligence and the FBI’s efforts to safeguard the nation from those who would steal our vital secrets.

	Our case against the Russian Foreign Intelligence Service (SVR) operatives—dubbed Operation Ghost Stories—went on for more than a decade. Today we are releasing dozens of still images, surveillance video clips, and documents related to the investigation as part of a Freedom of Information Act request.

	Although the SVR “illegals,” as they were called, never got their hands on any classified documents, their intent from the start was serious, well-funded by the SVR, and far-ranging.

	“The Russian government spent significant funds and many years training and deploying these operatives,” said one of our counterintelligence agents who worked on the case. “No government does that without expecting a return on its investment.”

	Our agents and analysts watched the deep-cover operatives as they established themselves in the U.S. (some by using stolen identities) and went about leading seemingly normal lives—getting married, buying homes, raising children, and assimilating into American society.

	Using surveillance and sophisticated techniques, aided by support from intelligence analysts, investigators gathered information to understand the threat posed by the spies as well as their methods, or tradecraft.

	The deep-cover Russian spies may not have achieved their objective, but they were not idle. They collected information and transmitted it back to Russia, and they were actively engaged in what is known in the spy business as “spotting and assessing.”

	They identified colleagues, friends, and others who might be vulnerable targets, and it is possible they were seeking to co-opt people they encountered in the academic environment who might one day hold positions of power and influence.

	Perhaps the most famous example of this tactic—the Cambridge Five—took place in Great Britain. Soviet intelligence “talent spotters” were able to recruit Cambridge University students in the 1930s—including future spy Kim Philby—who would later rise to power in the British government and become Soviet operatives during World War II and into the 1950s.

	“We believe the SVR illegals may well have hoped to do the same thing here,” said a counterintelligence agent.


The FBI arrested 10 of these "deep cover" Russian spies in June 2010. These spies would get jobs, get married, have children, and appear to live normal American lives.  While living their double lives, the spies worked their way into positions of power or tried to befriend powerful people. Interestingly, they didn't do much in the way of stealing secrets:


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/29/AR2010062905401.html
	Unlike famous spies such as Aldrich H. Ames and Robert P. Hanssen, who did incalculable damage to U.S. national security, those charged this week were ordered not to seek classified data, some federal officials said.

	"They were here under deep cover, as a network in case Russian intelligence ever needed anything," said one law enforcement official, who like others quoted in this report spoke on the condition of anonymity because the investigation is continuing. "The idea was that they would become so Americanized that no one can ever find any connection between them and Russia." 


It's important to understand that Russian intelligence views clandestine operations very differently than most people think. A secret agent doesn't necessarily need to steal secrets to hurt the target country or help their own:


https://www.hsdl.org/?view&did=768335
	Political influence operations were arguably the most important but least understood aspect of Soviet active measures: “They are difficult to trace and to deal with because they fall in the gray area between a legitimate exchange of ideas and an active measures operation.” They included exploitation of “agents of influence” and unwitting contacts in order to “insinuate the official voice of the Soviet Union into foreign governmental, political, journalistic, business, labor, artistic, and academic circles in a non-attributable or at least seemingly unofficial matter.” 150 KGB influence networks depended on developing strong personal relationships with political, economic, and media figures in the West and the Third World:

		The main objective of an influence operation is the use of the agent’s position—be it in government, politics, labor, journalism, or some other field—to support and promote political conditions desired by the sponsoring foreign power. This operation is one element of a carefully orchestrated effort: “kombinatsia” = the skill of relating, linking, and combining various agents of influence (at various times in various places) with special operational undertakings, in such a way as to enhance effectiveness. The first phase entails development of strong covert personal relationships with important figures in foreign societies. Next step is to secure active collaboration of the individual on matters of mutual interest (money, assistance in achievement of political or personal goals).


The Russian spies were "getting close to high-ranking officials" before they got arrested, so we don't know for sure if they secured "covert personal relationships" with anyone important or how they might have "secured their collaboration." But they left enough clues for us to make a good guess at how this might have worked.

One of the agents, Donald Heathfield, founded a strategic planning company called "Future Map." According to the FBI, Future Map was a "cover" for Russian intelligence operations:


http://archive.boston.com/news/local/massachusetts/articles/2010/07/01/business_opened_doors_for_spy_suspect/
	When Donald Heathfield was launching his business, Future Map, the accused Russian spy turned to a college intern for help developing software that would help companies carry out strategic planning in complex systems.

	The former intern said yesterday that Heathfield clearly needed his help.

	“He was basically using what amounted to a calendar with a few bells and whistles,’’ said the intern, who asked that his name not be published to avoid linking him to an accused spy. “It was a piece of junk.’’

	The quality may not have mattered much. According to the FBI, Heathfield’s consulting business, run out of his Cambridge apartment, was a “cover’’ designed to help him collect intelligence for his bosses at the Russian spy agency, SVR.

	The FBI affidavit says Heathfield collected a Russian government subsidy to operate the business, including one expense claim for $4,900 for “business [his cover].’’ The firm seemed to have few if any customers, yet still enabled Heathfield to meet people and travel the world, building ties with influential Americans in senior corporate and government roles.


An archived version of Future Map's website (https://web.archive.org/web/20081001032736/http://www.futuremap.com:80/about_advisors.html) lists four advisors: "Technology and Innovation" Professor and futurist William Halal, Wall Street analyst Kent Summers, "Futures Research" advocate Jerome Glenn, and former national security advisor to Al Gore Leon Fuerth.

Kent Summers doesn't have a high public profile, but the other three have varying levels of connections to Russian influence operations.

A good chunk of Russia's propaganda involves spreading some kind of psuedoscience nonsense (it's something I have to look into more), or spreading distrust of the same ideas they promote:


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...ancient-code.com ... humansarefree.com ... allnewspipeline.com ... activistpost.com ... newswithviews.com ... galacticconnection.com ... countercurrents.org...


http://humansarefree.com/2015/03/7-things-you-must-know-to-be-free.html
	7 Things You Must Know to Be a Free-Thinker

	The greatest innovators, futurists, visionaries and thinkers saw beyond that narrative. They burst the time bubble open and saw ahead of their time.


http://humansarefree.com/2017/05/this-child-claims-he-lived-on-mars-in.html
	This Child Claims He Lived On Mars in Previous Incarnation and 'People Like Us Still Live There'


http://www.ancient-code.com/parallel-universes-and-the-deja-vu-phenomenon-a-mysterious-mindboggling-connection/
	According to Dr. Michio Kaku, an American futurist, theoretical physicist and popularizer of science, Parallel universes can explain the mysterious phenomenon and states that quantum physics actually provide the necessary details which suggest déjà vu might be caused by your ability to “flip between different universes.”


http://www.ancient-code.com/researchers-may-found-conclusive-evidence-another-universe/
	Researchers may have found conclusive evidence of another UNIVERSE


http://galacticconnection.com/to-those-who-are-ascending-with-their-physical-structure-message-from-prime-creator-may-25-2017/
	To Those Who ARE ASCENDING WITH THEIR PHYSICAL STRUCTURE: Message From Prime Creator, May 25, 2017


https://www.newswithviews.com/baldwin/baldwin606.htm
	Webster's (1992) Dictionary defines "Futurism" as: "Study of, and interest in, forecasting or anticipating the future, or theorizing on how to IMPOSE CONTROLS ON EVENTS." (Emphasis added.)

	Steve Farrell rightly notes that "futurism is a head-in-the-clouds political philosophy, complete with theories and forecasts, which envisions the use of force to insure that those theories and forecasts come to pass." Farrell summarizes "conservative futurism" as "communism with economic vision."


Glenn is highly cited by Russian propaganda sites that have this slant:


http://allnewspipeline.com/Davos_Devils_Openly_Push_NWO_Agenda.php
	Starting with the most concerning page I found linked on the "Global Strategic Foresight Community - Members' Perspectives On Global Shifts" URL is linked to the image, third row down, far right, leading to a page titled  "The Age of Conscious-Technology," with a subtitle of "Can We Envision the Future We Want While We Still Have Time to Shape It?" from Jerome Glenn, The Millennium Project. 


http://www.activistpost.com/2012/06/us-government-gives-un-classified-tesla.html
	The UN admonishes carbon dioxide emissions as the direct causation to global warming (although this theory has been debunked by empirical scientific data). With wireless energy transmission, Jerome Glenn, director of the Millennium Project, claims they will avert a “potentially catastrophic” global problem “and eventually open up new energy sources such as solar panels in Earth’s orbit.”


http://www.newswithviews.com/Horn/thomas150.htm
	Synthetic biologists forecast that as computer code is written to create software to augment human capabilities, so too genetic code will be written to create life forms to augment civilization. —Jerome C. Glenn 


http://www.countercurrents.org/glenn190812.htm
	"The World Is Improving Better Than Pessimists Know,
But Dangers Are Worse Than Optimists Indicate"

	By Jerome C. Glenn

	18 August, 2012
	The Millenium Project

	What’s happening that will change the world for better or worse? What do we need to know now to build a better future? The Millennium Project releases the 2012 State of the Future report – the annual “Report Card on the World.”


And Glenn does his own spreading of nonsense:


http://www.eccssa.org/id73.htm
	He invented the "Futures Wheel" a futures assessment technique, Futuristic Curriculum Development, and concepts such as conscious-technology, transinstutions, tele-nations, management by understanding, definition of environmental security, feminine brain drain, just-in-time knowledge and learning, information warfare, feelysis, nodes as a management concept for interconnecting global and local views and actions, and coined the term futuring in 1973. 


Halal does his own spreading of spacey-sounding nonsense as well:


http://www.afcea.org/content/?q=Blog-future-may-depend-learning-develop-global-conscience
	Blog: Future May Depend on Learning to Develop a Global Conscience
	May 19, 2016
	By Beverly Mowery Cooper

	...According to Halal, the next logical step beyond knowledge is a global consciousness of values, beliefs, ideology and choices. He says a movement will begin to go beyond knowledge in the face of a global mega crisis and also will involve the restructuring of institutions.

	The global mega crisis will occur, Halal said, when a confluence of threats, such as climate change, energy and water shortages, financial system collapse and terrorism, converge. Most people do not believe these issues can be solved because of a lack of leadership and vision. Addressing the biggest challenge of civilization will require different forms of consciousness and thinking.


especially with his foreign policy views:


http://billhalal.com/index.php?q=bio&paged=11
	Consider some long-term benefits of America’s soft power policies:

	SYRIA  The slaughter of civilians goes on, but Obama may be wise not to get sucked into what looks like a great civil war between Shiites and Sunnis. Putin has earned the condemnation of the world by helping Assad continue the slaughter, while Obama eliminated chemical weapons in Syria without firing a shot.

	IRAN  After decades of futile sword rattling by American hawks, Obama’s policy of engagement has finally brought Iran to the bargaining table, and it looks like a solution may be possible.

	UKRAINE  Putin may be enjoying his display of bravado, but he has demonstrated that Russia remains a backward nation bent on cold war violence. Apart from the energy companies rushing to tap Russia’s gas and oil, who would want to invest in an economy based on extractive industries, corruption, and force? In contrast, Obama’s patient use of sanctions has taken the air out of Putin’s sails and avoided escalation.


But Fuerth is the most interesting. Fuerth denies being an advisor for Donald Healthfield and Future Map:


https://web.archive.org/web/20150216030222/https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10001424052748703571704575341633816865778
	A 2008 version of the website for Mr. Heathfield's company, Future Map, lists Leon Fuerth, former Vice President Al Gore's top national-security aide, as an adviser.

	Mr. Fuerth, in an email to The Wall Street Journal, denied he was ever an adviser to Future Map. Mr. Fuerth said he met Mr. Heathfield after delivering a speech and that Mr. Heathfield once proposed a partnership on a research grant.

	"Heathfield introduced himself to me after a speech I gave, and described himself as having similar interests in the subject of long-range foresight as a means for making better decisions," Mr. Fuerth said. "I was (still am) teaching the subject, and he represented that he was dealing with it as a business subject. Eventually, he proposed that we look for a way to partner on a research grant—but the idea didn't appeal to me. Once he understood that I was not interested, he stopped communicating."

	Mr. Fuerth, on vacation in Asia, said he plans to provide details of his contact with Mr. Heathfield to U.S. authorities as soon as possible. "I have never been an advisor to his business," he said. 


https://web.archive.org/web/20081001032736/http://www.futuremap.com:80/about_advisors.html
	Future Map Advisors
	
	...Leon Fuerth


https://web.archive.org/web/20090105175515/http://www.futuremap.com/about_team.html
	Future Map Team

	Don Heathfield

	Don Heathfield is the inventor of the Future Map concept and the CEO of the company.


https://www.justice.gov/opa/pr/ten-russian-agents-plead-guilty-and-are-be-removed-united-states
	Ten individuals pleaded guilty today in Manhattan federal court to conspiring to serve as unlawful agents of the Russian Federation

	...Defendants "Donald Howard Heathfield" and "Tracey Lee Ann Foley" admitted they are Russian citizens named Andrey Bezrukov and Elena Vavilova, and are agents of the Russian Federation. 


If Fuerth wasn't an advisor of Heathfield, he didn't seem to mind being called one--he was listed as an advisor to Future Map for at least 10 months (https://web.archive.org/web/20090131213150/http://www.futuremap.com:80/about_advisors.html). It sounds like Fuerth is lying about being associated with a Russian spy, and one has to wonder if Fuerth is a Russian spy himself.

Like the Russian spies hoped to do, Fuerth had certainly succeeded in befriending influential people in policymaking circles. Fuerth has long had a close relationship with Vice President Al Gore:


http://www.russialist.org/archives/4428.html
	Mr. Fuerth is Vice President Gore's longest serving aide. Their relationship dates back to 1980, when Mr. Fuerth began advising Congressman Gore on arms control and defense policy after Gore was assigned to the House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence, where Mr. Fuerth was a staff member. When Mr. Gore was elected to the Senate in 1984, Mr. Fuerth joined his Senate staff as Senior Legislative Assistant for National Security. In that capacity, he advised Senator Gore on arms control, space policy, international trade, and global environmental issues.


https://partners.nytimes.com/library/politics/camp/042500wh-gore-fuerth.html
	President Gore's staff close enough to call him Al.

	...It is Leon Sigmund Fuerth, Mr. Gore's longest-serving aide, who has acted as his elder adviser on national security matters for two decades. The two men know each other so well that, like an old married couple, they can communicate through a grimace or a glance.

	The relationship goes back to 1980, when Mr. Fuerth, a staff member on Capitol Hill, tutored the young congressman from Tennessee nine years his junior several hours a week for more than a year on the arcana of arms control. Since then Mr. Fuerth has exercised an important influence on Mr. Gore, whose world view blends a belief in a strong defense, the elevation of issues like illness and the environment to the top of the national security agenda and a moralistic impulse to punish dictators. Mr. Fuerth has often stiffened his boss's spine, from pressing early on to use strikes to constrain Serbian forces from ethnic cleansing in Bosnia and Kosovo to taking an uncompromising line against Iraq, Iran and North Korea, which Mr. Fuerth has referred to privately as "giant zits on various parts of the body." 


And Fuerth is involved in a secret deal between Gore and Russian Prime minister Viktor Chernomyrdin to allow Russia to sell advanced weapons to Iran while avoiding mandatory penalties from U.S. anti-terrorism laws:


http://www.nytimes.com/2000/10/13/world/despite-a-secret-pact-by-gore-in-95-russian-arms-sales-to-iran-go-on.html
	In June 1995, Vice President Al Gore signed a secret agreement with Viktor S. Chernomyrdin, then the Russian prime minister, calling for an end to all Russian sales of conventional weapons to Iran by the end of 1999.

	But the deadline passed with no sign of a halt to such sales, despite repeated complaints late last year and this year to senior Russian officials by Mr. Gore, Secretary of State Madeleine K. Albright and Deputy Secretary of State Strobe Talbott. Moscow continues to be a significant supplier of conventional arms to Tehran despite the Gore-Chernomyrdin deal, the Central Intelligence Agency reported in August.

	The 1995 agreement allowed Moscow to fulfill existing sales contracts for specified weaponry, including a diesel submarine, torpedoes, anti-ship mines and hundreds of tanks and armored personnel carriers. But no other weapons were to be sold to Iran, and all shipments were to have been completed by last Dec. 31.

	In exchange for the Russian promises, the United States pledged not to seek penalties against Russia under a 1992 law that requires sanctions against countries that sell advanced weaponry to countries the State Department classifies as state sponsors of terrorism. Iran is on that list.

	...The Gore-Chernomyrdin agreement appeared to undercut a 1992 law, the Iran-Iraq Arms Nonproliferation Act, known as Gore-McCain after its principal sponsors, Mr. Gore, then a senator from Tennessee, and Senator John McCain, the Arizona Republican. The law was rooted in concerns about Russian sales to Iran of some of the same weapons that the Gore-Chernomyrdin agreement expressly allowed.

	...Mr. Gore's chief foreign policy adviser, Leon Fuerth, said the deliveries were not subject to sanctions because they did not meet the 1992 act's definition of ''advanced conventional weapons'' and did not significantly change the balance of power in the Persian Gulf. But, he said, Mr. Gore brandished the threat as leverage to induce the Russians to sign the agreement, in part to learn more about what arms Moscow was sending to Tehran.

	''We deliberately used the Gore-McCain law as a fulcrum to negotiate an understanding with Russia to put constraints on their exports to Iran,'' Mr. Fuerth said, by setting a cut-off date of Dec. 31, 1999.

	Strengthening the lever was the submarine being supplied, the third of three Kilo-class subs that Russia sold to Iran. The sub was of particular concern to American policymakers because it can be hard to detect and could pose a threat to oil tankers or American warships in the gulf.

	Mr. Gore and Mr. McCain specifically cited the submarine and its deadly long-range torpedoes as one reason the 1992 nonproliferation act was needed, according to the Congressional Research Service.

	Mr. Fuerth acknowledged that Russia had failed to meet its promise to end deliveries by Dec. 31. ''We have indicated we are not satisfied with a unilateral decision by the Russians to modify the terms of this understanding,'' he said.


Reportedly, Fuerth was closely involved in deals between Gore and Chernomyrdin:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/1998/03/14/gore-carves-unique-post-with-us-russia-collaboration/be749adc-3650-405f-915f-811d33b9a798/
	Within the Clinton administration, the role of the commission -- and of a similar structure Gore has developed with South Africa -- has propelled the vice president and his national security adviser, Leon Fuerth, into a position of foreign policy influence rarely achieved at the vice presidential level.

	Fuerth, the de facto executive secretary of Gore-Chernomyrdin, is a member of the "principals committee" of senior foreign policy advisers to President Clinton. That designation means he often joins Secretary of State Madeleine Albright, Defense Secretary William S. Cohen and White House National Security Adviser Samuel "Sandy" Berger when major decisions are being made.

	Fuerth, who has been an adviser to Gore since Gore was in the House of Representatives, is also a member of the administration's Policy Steering Group on the Former Soviet Union


But his excuses for the Iran weapons deal aren't very good:


http://articles.latimes.com/2000/oct/24/news/mn-41201/2
	Gore's Links With Russian Now a Liability

	Indeed, Fuerth argued, using sanctions against Russia--which would have meant cutting off all U.S. aid and working to block loans from the IMF and other international institutions--would have been disastrous.

	"We feared that if we were to invoke sanctions, we would increase the possibility that the Yeltsin era would end with the restoration of Communist Party rule or an extreme nationalist like [Vladimir] Zhirinovksy," he said.


Fuerth and Gore also helped fund corrupt Russian oligarchs and Russia's war in Chechnya:


https://partners.nytimes.com/library/politics/camp/042500wh-gore-fuerth.html
	As manager of the binational commissions that Mr. Gore created with Russia, South Africa, Egypt, Kazakhstan and Ukraine, Mr. Fuerth has tackled unconventional issues that sometimes slip through the cracks. But both he and the vice president have been criticized for being slow to accept mounting evidence from the intelligence community of the level of Russian corruption, particularly among Mr. Gore's counterparts on the bilateral commission with Russia. 


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-srv/politics/campaigns/wh2000/stories/gore082799.htm
	New revelations about Russian money laundering through a major U.S. bank have presented Vice President Gore with a potentially difficult campaign issue, and once again illustrated the pitfalls of running for the White House from the vice president's chair.

	A criminal investigation into charges that Russian mobsters and politicians may have laundered money -- including diverted international aid funds -- through accounts at the Bank of New York has revived a long-standing debate in Washington over whether the Clinton administration has given too much support to a Russian government known to be plagued by corruption.

	...The Gore team has responded to the emerging issue with uncharacteristic speed, offering one of the most detailed accounts to date of the vice president's conversations with Russian leaders about the country's crime problems. At the same time, aides have stressed that Gore, although touted as the "most involved vice president in history," had no idea federal investigators were looking into allegations that the Bank of New York laundered billions for Russian criminals, including some with close connections to the government of President Boris Yeltsin.

	"With respect to stories about the Bank of New York, the vice president would not have been aware of it," said Leon S. Fuerth, Gore's top national security adviser. "He learned of it reading the newspapers."

	Though no one has charged that Gore knew of the financial diversions, the still-emerging money laundering scandal has tendrils that could run close to the vice president. One of the Russians suspected of having engineered the diversion of millions of dollars through the New York accounts, Konstantin Kagalovsky, was Russia's representative to the International Monetary Fund from 1992 to 1995 at a time the Clinton administration was deeply involved in IMF lending to Russia. Chernomyrdin, Kagalovsky's boss and Gore's partner in the bilateral commission from 1993 until last year, has been the target of numerous allegations of corruption, some compiled by Western intelligence agencies.

	 ...Forbes, who plans to talk regularly on the campaign trail about the Russian economic crisis, said Gore long ignored warning signs that the country was in grave trouble.

	"It's long been in the papers that tens of millions of Russians are not being paid; it's long been known billions are being siphoned off," Forbes said. "This is nothing new and yet they keep shoveling billions of IMF money into a government that misuses it and into a government that doesn't pay its workers."

	 ...Fuerth said that Gore never met Kagalovsky and had long pressed Russian leaders to reform. The subject of organized crime in Russia "has come up on a number of occasions through the [bilateral] commission," he said, noting that Gore "went out of his way to make sure the Russians participated" in a global conference on crime and corruption held in late February at the State Department.

	"On many other occasions, the vice president has talked about the need to get a grip on this," Fuerth added.


https://www.rferl.org/a/1094418.html
	The man who may be the next White House national security adviser says the West can help Russian President Vladimir Putin fight corruption in his country. But he says the job ultimately must be done by the Moscow government itself. Washington correspondent Andrew F. Tully reports.

	Washington, 26 July 2000 (RFE/RL) - The national security adviser to U.S. Vice President Al Gore says the American government is doing everything it can to help Moscow fight corruption in Russia.

	But the adviser, Leon Fuerth, emphasized that the U.S. and other Western countries can only help. The prime responsibility for fighting corruption, he said, lies with Russian President Vladimir Putin.

	...Fuerth said he and Gore are concerned about Putin's record since he took over the presidency from Boris Yeltsin on Jan. 1. He said Putin's ideas of a strong Russia are "contradictory and sometimes ominous." He said the war in Chechnya could become a "second Afghanistan." He decried Putin's restrictions on the news media.

	The adviser to Gore said Moscow has much to do to improve economic relations with the West in general and the U.S. in particular. This includes reforming the Russian judiciary, updating tax laws, passing the Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty, adopting Western accounting practices, and reforming its banking system.

	But overall, Fuerth endorsed Putin's economic plan.

	"His program is a program of vigorous economic reform along lines that we ourselves would have advocated -- and in fact did advocate it from the beginning of our close association with the Russian government. His program -- if it is carried out -- offers the single greatest hope for the rebirth of the Russian economy under conditions that are compatible with political freedom."


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-srv/WPcap/2000-01/05/049r-010500-idx.html
	Gore has been restrained on the subject of Russia's new leader, congratulating him and urging greater cooperation. "The vice president's position on Putin is essentially waiting for further indications of where Putin is going to go and how he's going to manage himself in this new situation," said Leon Fuerth, Gore's national security adviser.

	...While the Clinton administration has sharply criticized Russia's campaign in Chechnya, Clinton and Gore have opposed linking IMF funding to the war. Although Secretary of State Madeleine K. Albright had suggested tying one Ex-Im loan to Chechnya, the administration did nothing to block that loan last week.

	"For us to start doing this war dance is crazy in terms of the interests of the United States," said a Gore aide. Arguing that Gore's approach is "based on a lot of experience, whereas the others' experience is abstract," the aide charged that the other candidates are "too eager to cut ties, make breaks, show anger and embitter a relationship before you even get started."


In what might seem familiar in the Trump era, Gore has mostly acted like a guilty idiot:


http://www.nytimes.com/2000/10/13/world/despite-a-secret-pact-by-gore-in-95-russian-arms-sales-to-iran-go-on.html
	Some critics in Congress, as well as Governor George W. Bush's foreign policy advisers, say that Mr. Gore placed too much faith in his close personal relationship with Mr. Chernomyrdin, and that this led Mr. Gore to turn a blind eye to strong evidence of corruption by Mr. Chernomyrdin and associates, who appear to have profited handsomely from the rapid privatization of Soviet state enterprises.


http://www.wnd.com/2017/03/al-gore-climate-change-helped-cause-brexit/
	Al Gore: Climate change helped cause Brexit


http://www.nytimes.com/2000/10/13/world/despite-a-secret-pact-by-gore-in-95-russian-arms-sales-to-iran-go-on.html
	And the 1995 accord, which essentially exempted Russia from American sanctions on arms deliveries to Iran, emboldened Moscow to ignore other agreements, particularly on sales of missile and nuclear technology to Iran, according to Gordon C. Oehler, who directed the Nonproliferation Center of the Central Intelligence Agency until he retired in 1998.

	''It was one more of these strange deals that Gore and Chernomyrdin had that were kept from people,'' said Mr. Oehler, now a vice president with the Science Applications International Corporation in La Jolla, Calif. ''If this had been disclosed to Congress, the committees would have gone berserk, absolutely. But the larger problem is, if you have these under-the-table deals that give the Russians permission to do these things, it gives the signal that it's O.K. to do other things.''

	The 1995 arms agreement between Mr. Gore and Mr. Chernomyrdin was just one of more than a dozen during a three-day meeting in Moscow, the fifth session of the Gore-Chernomyrdin Commission, but it was not included in a list of accords released by the White House.

	...'This is significant, very significant,'' Mr. Gore said at the news conference. ''I would say that this has been resolved in a specific, mutually agreed fashion that does not leave any uncertainty or open ends that would create problems.''

	But no specific reference was made to a 12-paragraph document the men had signed, where the final paragraph reads, ''This aide-memoire, as well as the attached annexes, will remain strictly confidential.''


At the same time, Gore and Fuerth are said to have a close bond:


https://partners.nytimes.com/library/politics/camp/042500wh-gore-fuerth.html
	Yet for all his his influence, including membership in the cabinet-level Principals' Committee that advises the president on foreign policy, the onetime foreign service officer labors largely in the shadows. He rarely gives speeches or interviews. He has written no great tomes. He likes to work alone. At one point he announced at a press briefing that his goal was to remain "nameless, faceless and odorless"; at another he told aides that his ideas "belong to the vice president." 

	 Mr. Gore praises that approach as positively quaint and has hinted that he may name Mr. Fuerth as national security adviser in a Gore administration.

	"He has a keen intellect, a strong character, absolute integrity and excellent instincts," Mr. Gore said in a telephone interview. "There is a certain quaintness to his insistence on taking as little credit for anything he can possibly push off to others, quaintness in the sense not that it is odd. In fact, I wish it were more common. In today's world that quality is all too rare." 

	...Asked about Time magazine's prediction last year that Mr. Fuerth was "a cinch" to be national security adviser in a Gore administration, Mr. Gore at first stuck to his rule not to discuss potential advisers. But then he added, "If I were to break that rule for anybody, it would be for Leon." 


Reportedly, Fuerth and Vice President Gore would literally giggle and pass each other notes:


https://partners.nytimes.com/library/politics/camp/042500wh-gore-fuerth.html
	Mr. Gore, nevertheless, relies on Mr. Fuerth for both data and analysis, which he often delivers in a constant stream of hand-written, humor-laced, policy-filled billets-doux during meetings, meals and even receiving lines. The note-passing became so disruptive during the president's cabinet meetings that protocol was abandoned and Mr. Fuerth was given a permanent seat at the vice president's immediate right. 


And Fuerth is said to "feed ideas" to Gore:


https://partners.nytimes.com/library/politics/camp/042500wh-gore-fuerth.html
	But Mr. Fuerth has something that no other national security expert does: an intimate relationship with Mr. Gore. And Mr. Gore may just want to keep the man he calls "a great friend" close to his side, doing what he has always done -- keeping him informed, passing him notes, feeding him ideas, making him laugh and always, always giving him the credit. 


If Fuerth wasn't a Russian spy, he really went out of his way to act like one--he helped Gore sign-off on an illegal arms deal between Russia and Iran, covered for Gore funding Russian oligarchs, called for the U.S. to defer to Putin, joined a Russian intelligence front organization then denied any involvement.

This is what we can expect when a Russian spy gets close to a U.S. policymaker, especially ones like Gore or Trump. Placing a spy as high as national security advisor to the Vice President or advisor to the President is overkill if the Russians just want to steal secrets--there are plenty of ways to do that already (see https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/csi-studies/studies/vol47no1/article02.html). But what they can do that bugs and wiretaps can't is influence U.S. leaders and U.S. policy itself, which--if the Gore-Chernomyrdin deal tells us anything--can be much more valuable than stealing secrets.

This is probably the most misunderstood aspect of Russian intelligence operations. It's questionable whether you should call them a spy agency at all--in a general sense, most of what they do is not to spy on people, but to change people's minds:


https://www.hsdl.org/?view&did=768335
	By this time, compared to Soviet espionage efforts, “aktivinyye meropriatia” (translated in English as “active measures”) comprised an estimated 85% of KGB activities—and yet received considerably less scrutiny from the international community. Even within Western intelligence and special operations organizations, the patient, persistent implementation of active measures as an instrument of Soviet strategy remains generally unappreciated, if not largely unknown. Of course, this in itself is a testament to its holistic effectiveness.


https://archive.org/stream/YuriBezmenovBlackIsBeautifulCommunismIsNot/YuriBezmenovBlackIsBeautiful_djvu.txt
	Why do you think KGB socializes with professors of political science? What kind of secrets we want from professor? We don't want his secrets. We want the brains of his students. The KGB is not after secrets. It is after public opinion.


https://www.hsdl.org/?view&did=768335
	At the same time, the Soviets understood that—in order to realize its determined goal of global conquest—they could not subdue a diametrically opposed Western power like the U.S. through military confrontation. This was more than a volatile nuclear arms race; it was an exceptionally complex war of ideas. Because conventional military means weren’t a practical policy option, the Soviets concluded it was time to more aggressively pursue an indirect approach to defeating Western threats, using existing assets. Consequently, the KGB's new "Department D" (later rebranded “Service A”) and its renewed strategy of active measures emerged.

	...The size and growth of active measures resources, personnel, and operations from 1959-1989 strongly suggest that Moscow viewed this component of strategy as paramount.

	...conclusions from U.S. intelligence assert that the overall effectiveness of active measures “is shown by indirect evidence”:

		The fact that the Soviet leadership continues to use active measures on a large scale and apparently funds them generously suggests a positive assessment of their value as a foreign policy instrument. . . . techniques are effective in varying degrees, but, because they occur in tandem with other Soviet activities, it is difficult to judge the degree of effectiveness of any one of the available techniques in the abstract. . . . What we have seen indicates that Soviet active measures are conducted on a worldwide scale, are well integrated with other Soviet foreign policy actions, and appear frequently to be effective.


If there's a reason Russian intelligence values influence operations so much, it might be from looking to their own history. Russian intelligence today can trace their roots to the Okhrana, whose influence operations contributed to major world events like the Russian Civil War, World War I, and World War II:


https://pastebin.com/e4qCs1AT


https://etd.ohiolink.edu/!etd.send_file?accession=ohiou1398772391
	Since the collapse of the socialist state and the opening of the Soviet archives, the historical community has only begun to understand the full extent of crimes committed at the hands of the Cheka, and its successors, the OGPU, NKVD, and KGB. Yet, after tracing this repression to its origins, historical evidence indicates that Imperial Russia first cultivated this culture of secret policing and introduced many of the policing techniques the Bolsheviks later implement and further perfected. By the turn of the 20th century, the Okhrana – the Tsarist secret police – developed into a highly effective political police force which was, by and large, quite successful in penetrating underground revolutionary organizations, including Lenin’s Bolshevik party. The imperial political police cultivated a new tradecraft that influenced the later Soviet apparatuses in cryptanalysis, signals intelligence, external surveillance, and agent provocateurs.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Okhrana
	The Okhrana used many seemingly unorthodox methods in the pursuit of its mission to defend the monarchy; indeed, some of the Okhrana’s activities even contributed to the wave of domestic unrest and revolutionary terror that they were intended to quell. Perhaps most paradoxical of all was the Okhrana’s collaboration with revolutionary organizations. Among the early Okhrana agents to work alongside revolutionaries was Lieutenant-Colonel Gregory Sudeykin of the St. Petersburg Special Section, who, in 1882, set up an illegal printing operation to publish the revolutionary People’s Will with Okhrana funds. Sudeykin and his colleague, a revolutionary-turned-police-informant named Sergey Degayev, passed drafts of the publication through Okhrana censors before printing. This episode marked the beginning of the Okhrana’s efforts to surreptitiously observe, but also influence and undermine, revolutionary movements. This focus on infiltrating and influencing revolutionary groups, rather than merely identifying and arresting their members, was intensified by the innovations of one Okhrana bureau chief, Sergey Zubatov. While P.I. Rachkovsky, as head of the Okhrana’s Foreign Agency, had long ordered Okhrana agents to infiltrate and influence revolutionary movements abroad, Zubatov brought these tactics to a new level by creating Okhrana-controlled trade unions, the foundation of police socialism.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Pyotr_Rachkovsky
	Rachkovsky may have also played a role in amplifying the carnage of World War I: "Rachkovsky’s bosses in Russia and his hosts in Paris both feared the radicals, allowing the Russian agent to tighten the ties between the two nations. He succeeded so well that [historian Alex] Butterworth argues he was partly to blame for the Russo-French alliance that helped make World War I such a bloody mess."


https://www.cia.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/csi-publications/books-and-monographs/okhrana-the-paris-operations-of-the-russian-imperial-police/5474-1.html
	Harting's case officer was Pyotr Rachkovsky, probably the ablest head of the Okhrana's Foreign Bureau. Rachkovsky was a pioneer. He refined the art of what we today call active measures or perceptions management techniques. 	

	...According to one authority, Rachkovsky was a "born intriguer" who "delighted" in forging documents. He allegedly was among those responsible for the anti-Semitic Protocols of the Elders of Zion, perhaps the most infamous political forgery of the 20th century. Rachkovsky's tactic of exploiting anti-Semitism for political purposes was used repeatedly during the Soviet era--for example, in Hungary in 1956, in Czechoslovakia in 1968, and in Poland in the 1980s. Such scapegoating also was evident in the so-called "Doctors Plot" in the early 1950s, when a group of Jewish doctors was accused of plotting to kill Stalin and other Soviet leaders.


http://www.sscnet.ucla.edu/soc/groups/scr/kellogg.pdf
	It is important to note that the Protocols were not widely distributed in pre-Revolutionary Russian society, even in reactionary circles. They were not "discovered" until after the outbreak of the Bolshevik Revolution, after which they were widely distributed among the "White" forces during the Russian Civil War.


https://www.ushmm.org/wlc/en/article.php?ModuleId=10007058
	Nazi party ideologue Alfred Rosenberg introduced Hitler to the Protocols during the early 1920s, as Hitler was developing his worldview. Hitler referred to the Protocols in some of his early political speeches, and, throughout his career, he exploited the myth that "Jewish-Bolshevists" were conspiring to control the world.

	During the 1920s and 1930s, The Protocols of the Elders of Zion played an important part in the Nazis' propaganda arsenal. The Nazi party published at least 23 editions of the Protocols between 1919 and 1939. Following the Nazis' seizure of power in 1933, some schools used the Protocols to indoctrinate students. 


https://etd.ohiolink.edu/!etd.send_file?accession=ohiou1398772391
	First and foremost, the strong elements of continuity between the two policing apparatuses should force historians to reevaluate the culture of intelligence-gathering and espionage attributed, up to this point, only to the Soviet era in Russia’s overall history. This culture of secret policing, this narrative of the government in constant battle against its citizens, was rooted first in Imperial Russia, not the Soviet period. Yet, this culture was embraced, rather enthusiastically, by a regime that claimed to despise and hate the autocracy. This early exposure to a proto-police state very much influenced the mentality, and to some extent the radicalization, of the revolutionaries. Russian historian Orlando Figes concludes that “one can draw a straight line from the penal rigors of the Tsarist regime to the terrorism of the revolutionaries and indeed to the police state of the Bolsheviks.”

	Identifying the continuities between the Tsarist and Soviet secret police is also significant because it highlights that the achievements made by the Okhrana to the intelligence community are generally overlooked. Again, the secret policing organizations under the Soviet regime are generally characterized as innovators in intelligence-gathering and experts at the tradecraft. These characteristics, however, also accurately describe the Tsarist Okhrana, but hardly attributed to it in intelligence history. 
In the 1950s, the CIA correctly identified the importance of the Okhrana; the Agency’s deep interest in the Okhrana files opened at the Hoover Institution demonstrated that the Tsarist secret police held vital information on the tradecraft of the later Soviet apparatuses. Indeed, the Okhrana files did reveal important information on the Soviet methodology for gathering intelligence through external surveillance. According to Aleksei Myagkov, a KGB agent who defected in the 1970s, “it was not only the Cheka that made use of their [the Okhrana’s] methods; they also persist to this day, and are being extensively used by the KGB,” and that KGB recruits “were all astonished at the similarities between the Tsarist system and the KGB’s in the way of working with agents. 

	Studying the changes between the Tsarist Okhrana and the Soviet Cheka is significant as well, as it accurately highlights the major difference between Imperial Russia and the Soviet Union. Under the latter regime, the secret police force, and the state’s use of it for political subjugation, changed drastically in both scale and intent. The brutal police repression seen during the Bolshevik’s first few years surpassed the most violent days of Russian autocracy. The state justified every action the Cheka took as necessity to protect the revolution. For the Bolsheviks, the end justified the means – but the means used were barbaric. Lenin did not see the implementation of terror in terms of morality; in a speech given in February 1920, he stated bluntly, “for us this question is one of expediency.


Leaving such a big mark on history might have made Russian intelligence confident in their ability to influence. Whatever their reasons, Russian intelligence puts most of their resources into influence operations, and are said to view it as the backbone of how they wage war.

In the right place, even a single agent of influence can be more valuable than an army. During the Chinese civil war, the Soviets placed Zhang Zhizhong as a general under Chiang Kai-shek. Zhizhong played a major role in starting the second Sino-Japanese war:


http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
	The "sleeper" now wakened was a general called Zhang Zhizhong (whom we shall refer to as ZZZ), commander of the Shanghai-Nanjing garrison. In 1925 he had been a teacher at Whampoa, the Russian-funded and Russian-staffed military academy near Canton. From the day of its founding, Moscow made a determined effort to plant high-level agents in the Nationalist military.

	...ZZZ held the pivotal job of chief of the Shanghai-Nanjing garrison. He tried to talk Chiang into launching a "first strike" against Japan--not in northern China, where the fighting was, but 1,000 kilometres to the south, in Shanghai, where the small Japanese garrison was not involved in any military action at this stage. Chiang did not reply to this proposal, even though ZZZ repeated it many times.

	...At the end of July, right after the Japanese occupied Peking and Tianjin, ZZZ cabled Chiang again, arguing strongly for "taking the initiative" to start a war. After ZZZ said he would only do so if the Japanese showed unmistakable signs of attacking Shanghai, Chiang gave his conditional consent, stressing: "You must wait for orders about when this should happen."

	But on 9 August, without authorisation, ZZZ staged an incident outside Shanghai airport, where a Chinese army unit, which he himself had specially stationed there, shot dead a Japanese marine lieutenant and a private. A Chinese prisoner under sentence of death was then dressed in a Chinese uniform and shot dead at the airport gate, to make it seem that the Japanese had fired first. The Japanese gave every sign of wishing to defuse the incident, but ZZZ still bombarded Chiang with requests to launch an offensive, which Chiang vetoed. On the morning of the 13th, the Generalissimo told ZZZ not to launch a war "on impulse," but to "study and discuss" all the angles again, and then submit his plan. ZZZ pressed next day: "This army is determined to start the offensive against the enemy at 5 p.m. today Here is the plan. . ." On the 14th, Chinese planes bombed the Japanese flagship Izumo, as well as troops and navy planes on the ground, and ZZZ ordered a general offensive. But Chiang stopped him: "You must not attack this evening. Wait for order."  

	When no order arrived, ZZZ outflanked Chiang by issuing a press release next day; claiming, falsely; that Japanese warships had shelled Shanghai and that Japanese troops had started attacking the Chinese. With anti-Japanese feeling running high, Chiang was put on the spot. The following day; 16 August, he finally gave the order: "General assault for dawn tomorrow."

	But after one day's fighting, Chiang ordered a halt, on the 18th. ZZZ simply ignored the order and expanded his offensives. All-out war became unstoppable as large Japanese reinforcements began to arrive on 22 August.

	The Japanese inflicted tremendous casualties. In Shanghai, 73 of China's 180 divisions--and the best one-third--over 400,000 men, were thrown in, and all but wiped out. The conflict here consumed virtually all of China's nascent air force (which Chiang so treasured that he had not sent a single plane to the northern front), and the main warships. It significantly weakened the military force Chiang had been painstakingly building up since the early 1930S. The Japanese suffered much fewer, though still heavy; casualties: about 40,000.

	Once Chiang was forced into all-out war, Stalin moved with alacrity to bolster Chiang's capability to sustain a war. He signed a non-aggression treaty with Nanjing on 21 August, and started to supply Chiang with weapons. China could not manufacture any weapons except rifles. Stalin advanced Chiang U.S. $250 million for arms purchases from Russia, which included 1,000 planes, plus tanks and artillery and committed a sizeable Soviet air force contingent. Moscow sent some 300 military advisers, headed for a time by the Chinese-speaking General Vasili Chuikov, later of Stalingrad fame. For the next four years, Russia was not only China's main supplier of arms, but virtually its only source of heavy weapons, artillery and planes.

	Moscow was exhilarated by the turn of events, as the Soviet foreign minister, Maksim Litvinov, admitted to French vice-premier Leon Blum. According to Blum, Litvinov told him that "he [Litvinov] and the Soviet Union were perfectly delighted that Japan had attacked China [adding] that the Soviet Union hoped that way between China and Japan would continue just as long as possible..."


The war wore down the Japanese and Chinese Nationalist forces while the Communists gained an edge. After the war, the Soviets faced little difficulty taking Manchuria from the weakened Japanese and leaving behind Japanese arms for the Communists to scavenge (https://pastebin.com/e4qCs1AT).

But starting a war in a "divide and conquer" strategy is just another kind of influence operation--Zhang Zhizhong, if indirectly, convinced the Japanese and Chinese to fight.

If you wanted to be really abstract about it, you could say every war is an influence operation--if soldiers obey their general, its because, one way or another, that general has influence over them. If that general is a spy, then the government he works for has influence over all of his soldiers. Such influence would be limited but what a spy posing as a general can get away with without blowing his cover, but it is influence nonetheless.

To take this further, influencing how the soldiers think can push the boundaries of what a spy working as a general can get away with. It would be very suspicious for one general to order his soldiers to attack the armies of another general in the same country. But after the death of Emperor Yuan Shikai in China, that's exactly what happened--the Chinese people were already restless and divided, and suddenly there was no clear leader. Chinese generals began carving out their own fiefdoms and fighting each other for power (a period of about 12 years known as the "Warlord Era").

You can see this at work with Russia's influence operations targeting the Chinese public in the early 20th century, which helped destabilize the country:


https://books.google.com/books?id=2RHIAeZEYjIC&pg=PA61
	The agents also reported that Joffe had offered Russian moral and financial support to Sun and the Koumintang on condition that the agree (a) immediately and openly to recognize the Soviet as the legitimate government; (b) to conclude an open alliance with the Soviet government; and (c) to place no restrictions on Bolshevik propaganda in China. Dr. Sun was agreeable to the first two conditions but no to the third


https://books.google.com/books?id=71OcBQAAQBAJ&pg=PA37&lpg=PA37
	The revolutionary atmosphere that prevailed during the First United Front brought many disparate groups together for the common causes of eradicating warlordism and resisting imperialism, but also served the communist cause well. For the duration of the United Front, the Youth League was able to take advantage of revolutionary sentiment to elevate its profile and expand its membership and it could do all of this entirely in the open.


https://books.google.com/books?id=2RHIAeZEYjIC&pg=PA61
	...Dr. Sun held that the Communist order or even the Soviet system could not actually be introduced in China. This view was entirely shared by Mr. Joffe, who was further of the opinion that China's paramount and pressing problem was to achieve national unification and attain national independence. Regarding this task he had assured Dr. Sun that Chin had the warmest Sympathy of the Russian people and could count on the support of Russia.


http://etheses.whiterose.ac.uk/9813/1/341813.pdf
	Another Chinese whom Popov visited was someone called Chin, who was reported to be an "anarchist working on a Chinese paper of Shanghai." ...It is worth noticing that, when Joffe arrived in Shanghai in 1923 he wrote a letter to a Chinese of the "New Russia Society" in Shanghai, whose surname was "Ch'in".  ...No matter who this "Chin" or "Chin" was, it indicated that the agents of Soviet Russia and the Comintern were successful in gaining the co-operation of some important Chinese anarchists. 

	...General Potapov's team visited Zhangzhou and they held several talks with the anarchists as well as with General Chen. In a talk, Potapov said:

		"If you understand socialism and admit the necessity of social revolution, no matter which way you go and what action you take, you are our Russian Bolsheviks' comrades. Therefore, we should work together and help each other. The Soviet Government wish to have friendship with all revolutionaries in the world, especially in Asian countries."

	...Since Esperanto was a language many Chinese anarchists knew, and was used in some Chinese anarchist periodicals, the Soviet agents tried to have a hand in Esperanto teaching in Shanghai and Beijing. In February 1920, a Soviet agent V. A. Stopany, who had formerly been a bookkeeper with the Russian Publishing and Printing Company and was working on the Shanghai Life, started a free night school for teaching Esperanto in Shanghai with Lu Shikai, an old Chinese anarchist scholar of Esperanto and one of Zhang Mochi's close friends. The night school was held at the New China School (Xinhua Xuexiao), which was a peripheral organisation of the Anarchist Comrades' Association. All the teachers at the Night School were anarchists. It was said that there were at most one hundred students attending the classes. Stopany often expounded his Communist ideas to his students, and encouraged "the study of Esperanto as a knowledge of that language would enable them to promote internationalism and Communism. " Soon the Esperanto Night School and the activities of its staff aroused the suspicion of the authorities in Shanghai. In a secret interview, Lu Shikai admitted that he and his Russian confrere were working in the interests of the Bolsheviks. 

	...The Soviet agents also made contact with anarchists in some other cities, but it is not necessary to go into the same detail in each case. Suffice it to say that their goals were to enlist the help of the Chinese anarchists for their revolutionary propaganda campaign; to use their organisational network for the establishment of the Socialists' League (see Chapter 6) and early Communist groups and to persuade some of the anarchists to change their beliefs and to become Communists.

	...Why was it that the largest groups of Chinese radicals whom the Soviet agents got in touch with at first were anarchists? To answer this we must take into account the special historical background and Soviet Russia's policies towards anarchists at that time. By doing so we will see then that what the Bolsheviks did among the Chinese was by no means accidental. 

	Firstly, as has been shown, anarchism was a type of radical socialist thought which had long been disseminated and therefore had widespread influence in China. Anarchists were the only formation in China at that time to advocate a social revolution from below. In all, there were more than fifty anarchist societies in China during the May 4th period. Moreover, all anarchists are internationalists. Without exception, the Chinese anarchist movement kept close links with the international anarchist movement. With this tradition, the Chinese anarchists were attuned to accepting aid from foreign countries and, conversely, offering help to their foreign comrades.

	Secondly, anarchist and Marxist ideologies have certain points in common. Both advocate social revolution to overthrow capitalist rule and eliminate the system of exploitation. Their ultimate aim is to realize an ideal society without classes or states. Anarcho-communism's principle of production and distribution in a future communist society, namely "from each according to his ability, to each according to his needs", is identical with that of Marxism. Originally anarchism and Marxism were different schools within the same working class movement, as Min sheng correctly pointed out, Marxists and anarchists belonged to "the same category but to different schools".

	Thirdly, many anarchists sympathised with and supported the Bolshevik Revolution from the very beginning. Since the events of the October Revolution followed in some ways the pattern anticipated by the anarchist theorists, for instance, the expropriation of the bourgeoisie, seizure of the means of production and establishment of workers' control and abolition of class distinctions and civil ranks, some anarchists regarded them as having met "certain fundamental principles and methods of Anarchist Communism. " The Chinese anarchists also hailed Russia's social revolution. A Chinese anarchist periodical Laodong (Labour Monthly) wrote: "Now China's neighbor Russia has waged a just and honorable social revolution to make equal the rich and the poor. " Another article in this periodical even described the Russian Bolsheviks as espousing anarcho-communism and thus regarded them as their "Russian brothers". Zhu Qianzhi, an anarchist student at Beijing University, expressed the opinion of many Chinese anarchists when he wrote that: "at that time the ordinary youths in China who advocated revolution, admired Russia's success and tried to use violent force to achieve the goals [of anarchism]."

	...the Bolsheviks made efforts to draw support from anarchists internationally. Since most anarchists and anarcho-syndicalists glorified revolution and advocated "direct action" by the masses to destroy capitalist rule, Lenin counted on them to play an important role in the "World Revolution". The Bolsheviks adopted quite different tactics towards anarchists in Russia and their co-thinkers in other countries. Not long after the October Revolution the Bolsheviks began their suppression of the Russian anarchist movement because the anarchists were denouncing the Bolsheviks' dictatorship. On the other hand, in their activities abroad the Bolsheviks were inclined to treat foreign anarchists in a friendly fashion. 


Eventually, these anarchists and communists became the CCP in the Chinese Civil War. In a broad sense, convincing the Chinese public of the necessity of socialist revolution made it even easier for China's generals to attack themselves. Changing public opinion in the right way can give spies more latitude to operate--something you can see in the attempts at eroding standards in American journalism today (https://pastebin.com/z49g6KKe).

With that in mind, it's interesting to see how the media at large covered the story of the 10 Russian spies arrested by the FBI in 2010:


http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/29/world/europe/29spy.html
	In Ordinary Lives, U.S. Sees the Work of Russian Agents

	By SCOTT SHANE and CHARLIE SAVAGE JUNE 28, 2010 

	The alleged agents were directed to gather information on nuclear weapons, American policy toward Iran, C.I.A. leadership, Congressional politics and many other topics, prosecutors say. The Russian spies made contact with a former high-ranking American national security official and a nuclear weapons researcher, among others. But the charges did not include espionage, and it was unclear what secrets the suspected spy ring — which included five couples — actually managed to collect.

	...“The magnitude, and the fact that so many illegals were involved, was a shock to me,” said Oleg D. Kalugin, a former K.G.B. general who was a Soviet spy in the United States in the 1960s and 1970s under “legal” cover as a diplomat and Radio Moscow correspondent. “It’s a return to the old days, but even in the worst years of the cold war, I think there were no more than 10 illegals in the U.S., probably fewer.”


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/29/AR2010062905249.html?hpid=topnews
	By Greg Miller and Philip P. Pan

	...exposing what U.S. intelligence experts described as Moscow's ongoing commitment to aggressive espionage operations, as well its fondness for spycraft techniques that haven't advanced since the KGB was dissolved.

	..."I think it's nutty," Hitz said. "It looks as if it got going at the end of the Soviet era and just continued, even though it wasn't clear what the immediate goals of these people were." 

	...Officials in the United States and Russia sought to contain the fallout from the case at a time of improving relations between the countries. President Obama took Russian President Dmitry Medvedev out for cheeseburgers last week. The administration is seeking Russian support on a range of initiatives, including sanctions designed to curb the nuclear ambitions of Iran. 

	...Russian Prime Minister Vladimir Putin said at the start of a meeting with former president Bill Clinton that the case showed that U.S. law enforcement agencies "have gotten out of hand." The former KGB agent added that he hopes U.S. relations "will not be damaged." 

	...The targets, and the methods employed, struck some as a sign that Russia's once vaunted spy service has struggled to evolve.

	"What a feckless operation," said Mark Lowenthal, a former senior CIA official. "So many of the things they seemed to be after you can find out by listening to the right radio station or reading the right newspaper. . . . It doesn't say a lot about the smarts of the SVR." The letters refer to Russia's foreign intelligence service, one of the successor agencies to the KGB. 

	The tradecraft employed was also spotty, experts said. Records depict scenes in which alleged spies arrived at a coffee shop and opened a laptop specially equipped to send secret transmissions at the precise moment that a vehicle driven by a known Russian official pulled up outside. 

	...U.S. officials said Russia remains a significant espionage target for American spy agencies but falls much lower on the priority list than places such as Iraq and Afghanistan. The CIA probably has dozens of case officers in Russia, former officials said, but bases nearly all of them in the U.S. Embassy, where they could claim diplomatic immunity if caught. 


http://swampland.time.com/2010/06/29/the-8-coolest-things-about-the-alleged-russian-spy-ring/
	The 8 Coolest Things About The Alleged Russian Spy Ring

	By Michael Scherer

	A day after the Obama Administration arrested 10 people across the U.S. on charges of being Russian spies, the Russian Foreign Ministry has dismissed the roundup as “completely unfounded,” and alleged that the accusations have been made “in the spirit of cold war spy mania.” There is no doubt that the latter is true


http://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/europe/the-timeline-russian-spies-2016360.html
	By Sam Muston 

	 Anna Chapman and Mikhail Semenko, 2010

	The arrest of the latest "deep-cover" Russian agents in the US will prove a further boon to writers of hackneyed spy fiction. Apparently eschewing the modern intelligence gathering techniques seen in the latest James Bond films, the pair would meet their handlers on park benches with the exchange of information preceded with: "Didn't we meet in California last summer?" "No, I think it was the Hamptons". The FBI have yet to confirm whether they wore trilby hats and carnations in their button holes.


https://web.archive.org/web/20100704035145/http://blogs.wsj.com:80/washwire/2010/06/29/alleged-russian-spies-a-novel-idea/
	Alleged Russian Spies: A Novel Idea?

	By Evan Perez

	The criminal complaints filed by U.S. prosecutors don’t portray any significant U.S. secrets that may have been compromised by the agents; in fact FBI wiretaps captured two of them discussing that they likely couldn’t pass vetting if they tried to get a U.S. government job. 


http://theweek.com/articles/493058/7-best-cloakanddagger-moments-from-russian-spy-case
	7 best cloak-and-dagger moments from the Russian spy case

	The Week Staff

	At times the U.S. government's case against the 11 alleged "deep cover" Russian spies reads like a Cold War thriller; other times, it seems like a spoof, filled with bumbling Austin Powers-like amateurs. The SVR (successor to the KGB) employed techniques both worthy of a James Bond villain (stealth laptop networks) and almost too primitive to believe (invisible ink). 


http://www.seattletimes.com/seattle-news/accused-russian-spies-sure-fooled-people-in-the-seattle-area/
	Accused Russian spies sure fooled people in the Seattle area 

	If Michael Zottoli and Patricia Mills secretly were Russian spies, they did an Oscar-worthy job of maintaining their cover as a boring young Seattle couple slavishly devoted to their toddler son.

	By Christine Willmsen and Jonathan Martin


http://www.nytimes.com/2010/06/30/nyregion/30suspects.html
	Curiosities Emerge About Suspected Russian Agents

	By JAMES BARRONJUNE 29, 2010 

	Neighbors said the F.B.I. descended on the house — 15 to 20 agents in black vans. The Murphys, led out in handcuffs, were put in separate cars. Neighbors said their younger daughter was home; their older daughter, who enter middle school in the fall, was at a friend’s birthday party. She was driven home by a friend while the raid was going on. She and her sister later left the house, carrying sleeping bags.


http://www.thedailybeast.com/russian-spies-the-illegals-laughter-at-the-kremlin
	Russian Spies, The Illegals: Laughter at the Kremlin

	The unlikely saga of the spies known as The Illegals has caused much mirth, but no diplomatic crisis, with Russia. Julia Ioffe talks to Russian officials who can't stop laughing.

	Boris Reznik, a parliamentarian from Russia’s ruling party, has a take on the spy saga now unfolding in the U.S.: “Why are you causing this scandal?” he says, chuckling. “Watch out, or we’ll arrest all your spies here in Moscow! You guys have more of them here.”

	Aside from the unfortunate timing of the event—coming just on the heels of Dmitry Medvedev’s honeymoon in the U.S. and at the G-8 summit—the roundup of the supposed Russian spy ring, known as The Illegals, has become some kind of strange American joke in Moscow. “It’s kind of unclear, and kind of stupid, and looks a bit like what we had here with that rock,” says Putin’s former chief of staff, the longtime Kremlin player Alexander Voloshin. He, too, laughs at the mention of the alleged spies. The rock he refers to is the 2006 incident when the Russian security services accused the British of using a rock to spy on them in Moscow. “It has about the same flavor,” Voloshin says, still trying to shake the giggles.

	Click the Image to View Our Gallery of Spies We Loved

	Sure, Russian officials have expressed hurt at the timing: Couldn’t they have waited a few months, you know, for the afterglow to pass after the high-level burger summit? And, behaving not unlike a woman scorned, Russians wonder: Who is trying to break America and us up?

	...Russians note that this motley crew hasn’t even been charged with spying. Instead, they stand accused of failing to register as foreign agents (maximum sentence five years) and money laundering (which could carry 20). And reading this complaint, it seems much more likely that a rogue element in the Russian secret service needed to launder some stolen cash and stumbled on some starry-eyed American suburban yokels and asked: “Hey, wanna be a spy?”


http://www.nydailynews.com/news/world/anna-chapman-russian-sleeper-agents-arrested-awarded-kremlin-top-medal-article-1.190482
	Bumbling Russian sleeper agents get Kremlin's top honor
	BY Helen Kennedy 

	Ten Russian sleeper spies who were so busy leading fake suburban American lives that they failed to learn any actual secrets were awarded the Kremlin's top medal Monday.


https://www.buzzfeed.com/russianspies/4-awesome-real-life-spy-stories
	Double Agents And Sexy Spies: 4 Real Life Espionage Stories

	Community User

	Spies are in the news right now, which is a good thing, because spies are pretty much the fucking best. Here are some of the most cold-bloodedly badass IRL spies of the last century, up to and including the awesome retro Russian spies who just got caught this week. 


https://www.buzzfeed.com/scott/the-illegals-program?utm_term=.ebBbGAQj4#.ubzObwZBg
	The Illegals Program

	Scott Lamb

 	The U.S. has uncovered an amazing Russian spy program, which has been operating undercover for years.

	10 people were arrested Monday in a sweep associated with the discovery. Many of the spies lived in pairs, and had babies as part of their cover! (Haha, spy babies.) This will no doubt get juicy, and then be turned into a movie starring Angelina Jolie.


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/06/30/AR2010063005074.html
	Alleged Russian agent Anna Chapman could have warmed up any Cold War night

	By Monica Hesse

 	There were 11 alleged Russian agents arrested this week, under accusations that they'd been living as Americans while reporting back to the mother country.

	But mostly we care about the hot one. 

	Ever since photos of Anna Chapman began circulating online late Tuesday, the Internet at large has been foaming, frothing, fanatic for details about the reported 28-year-old secret agent/Maxim model look-alike who specialized in sultry-eyed, pouty-lipped, come-hither stares. Da, da, da!


https://www.theguardian.com/world/2010/jul/09/russian-spies-espionage-exchange
	Russian spies going back to the cold – 10 agents admit their guilt 

 	Tom Parfitt in Moscow and Chris McGreal in Washington

	While the US-Russian swap may avoid any potential embarrassment to either government that a trial might pose, the exposure of Russia's spies on US soil leaves behind considerable disagreement over how seriously to take their espionage ring. While the FBI has portrayed the deep-cover "sleeper" agents as a threat to American security, their at times bumbling attempts to infiltrate high policy-making circles has made them figures of fun to many Americans.

	Chapman, a red-headed 28-year-old whose British former husband has sold compromising photos to tabloids, has become such a celebrity that a New York newspaper lamented her departure and asked if the city could keep her.


http://www.nytimes.com/2010/12/31/world/europe/31chapman.html
	Russian Spy? Maybe So. TV Darling, Absolutely.

	By MICHAEL SCHWIRTZ

	MOSCOW — She likes spy movies and the actress Angelina Jolie. She might be considering an acting career herself and really wants a feline pet. Well, a lion cub.

	These were the revelations from the first major public appearance by Anna Chapman, the young redhead who has achieved Hollywood-like celebrity here since she and nine others accused of being Russian sleeper agents were outed and deported from the United States six months ago.


https://www.forbes.com/sites/work-in-progress/2010/06/29/anna-chapman-russia-spy-or-real-estate-whiz/#50e651a363fb
	Anna Chapman: Sexy Russian Spy or Real Estate Whiz

	Meghan Casserly

	The Cold War may be over but Bond girls never go out of style.

	This morning’s papers have made much of suspected spy Anna Chapman’s youth and beauty in their coverage of an alleged espionage Russian ring. The New York Post described the redhead as “a 28 year old divorcee with a masters in economics, an online real-estate business, a fancy Financial District apartment and a Victoria’s Secret body.”


http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-1290475/Anna-Chapman-11-Russian-spies-accused-Cold-War-style-plot-US.html
	Red-headed femme fatale among 11 'Russian deep cover agents' accused of Cold War-style plot to spy on America

	By Daniel Bates

	...The agent was pretending to send the alleged spy on a mission to deliver a fake passport to another female agent, according to court documents.

	'Are you ready for this step?' he asked.

	'S*** yes,' was her emphatic reply.

	...Anna Chapman was of particular interest - and not just for her reputation as a beauty.

	She is believed to have entered the Russian Mission to the United Nations on ten occasions and sent messages to agents via a private wi-fi network.

	...The femme fatale, the stay-at-home dad, the top newspaper columnist: Who are the bumbling Russian 'spies'?


http://nypost.com/2010/06/29/spy-rings-femme-fatale/
	Spy ring’s ‘femme fatale’

	By Bruce Golding

	A ring of 11 Russian moles right out of a Cold War spy novel was smashed yesterday — and among those busted was a flame-haired, 007-worthy beauty who flitted from high-profile parties to top-secret meetings around Manhattan. 

	...The FBI claimed the two were corresponding via a secret online network.

	Last week, an undercover agent pretending to be a Russian official arranged a meeting to talk about the weekly laptop exchanges, pretending to be ready to send the sexy spy on a mission to deliver a fake passport to another female agent, according to the federal complaint.

	“Are you ready for this step?” he asked. “S¤-¤-¤-, yes,” Chapman allegedly gushed. 


http://www.politico.com/states/new-york/albany/story/2012/01/the-big-russian-life-of-anna-chapman-ex-spy-067223
	The big Russian life of Anna Chapman, ex-spy

	By Brett Forrest 

	It has been nearly a year and a half since the Federal Bureau of Investigation seized Anna Chapman, the Russian spy who had been working undercover in Manhattan real estate. Her arrest along with nine other Russians broke up the largest foreign intelligence network discovered on American soil since the Cold War.

	The Illegals, as they were called inside the Department of Justice, had infiltrated American society, nearly all of them going by Anglicized names, passing themselves off as white-collar professionals.

	But, long afterward, it's difficult to see what the spies ever learned or did of any real importance while stationed stateside on Vladimir Putin’s orders. Equally difficult to uncover is just how these agents could have fooled anyone, pretending to be American-born while speaking such heavily accented English.


The spies were mostly portrayed as bumbling and ineffectual. Most of the coverage was about one of the less effective spies, Anna Chapman, and how attractive she is:


https://www.bloomberg.com/news/articles/2011-09-29/how-anna-chapman-became-the-face-of-kremlin-capitalism
	She may have done unremarkable work back in the U.S. as a spy for Russia, but the woman the Russian media calls Agent 90-60-90 (for her measurements, in centimeters) is, somehow, everywhere. It’s been a little over a year since her return, a year of centerfolds, talk shows, and political rallies. The media, largely controlled by the authorities, still reports each of her many moves. Clearly the Kremlin has found her a useful hero.

	Days after she was unmasked by the FBI along with nine other spies living as unassuming professionals in Boston, New York, and New Jersey and traded for four Russian prisoners on a tarmac in Vienna, Chapman received a hero’s welcome at the Kremlin. She and her fellow spies sang a patriotic song from the Soviet film Sword and Shield with Putin and, a few months later, were given medals by Medvedev. She was appointed to a high post in the ruling party’s youth brigades and was the subject of a fawning one-hour interview special on government-controlled Channel One. She attended an innovation forum led by Medvedev and showed up at the Baikonur Cosmodrome in Kazakhstan to cheer on a Russian rocket launch.


But there was a lot more interesting things about these spies than Anna Chapman being attractive. Yet even when it was revealed that the spies were recruiting their children, (https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10000872396390444097904577537044185191340) the media mostly ignored the story or downplayed it:


https://www.theatlantic.com/international/archive/2012/07/russian-spy-ring-really-wanted-generation-spy-kids/325436/
	Russian Spy Ring Really Wanted a Generation of Spy Kids

	In one of the more disconcerting things you'll hear today concerning Russian spies, it appears that "Sexy Spy" Anna Chapman and the network of Russian sleeper agents known as The Illegals she belonged to, were thinking long-term and actually recruiting their members' children. 

	Alexander Abad-Santos


http://www.dailymail.co.uk/news/article-2179384/Revealed-Anna-Chapmans-Russian-spy-ring-groomed-American-children-spies.html
	Revealed: 'Femme Fatal' Anna Chapman's Russian spy ring 'groomed their American children to become agents'

	By Daily Mail Reporter

	[Four pictures of Anna Chapman in various poses]

	...Born Anna Kushchyenko, Miss Chapman adopted her surname after marrying British man Alex Chapman - who she claims to have fallen for because he looked like Oasis musician Liam Gallagher.


https://www.wired.com/2012/07/spy-kids/
	Robert Beckhusen

	Russian Sleeper Agent Allegedly Tried to Recruit Son Into Spy Business

	According to anonymous U.S. officials cited by the *Wall Street Journal'*s Devlin Barrett, the plot stemmed from a group of infamous Russian sleeper spies who were unmasked and deported back to Moscow two years ago. Before they were kicked out, they allegedly attempted to use their children as intelligence agents to bypass security clearances. Peter Krupp, the attorney who represented one of the accused spies, declined to answer the accusations on-the-record. But he told the *Journal *that his client said the U.S. officials are "crap." The attorney relayed that his client would never have taken the risk of revealing his secret identity.

	...There was also an amateurish feel to the spies' work. Their secret spy computers were apparently junk. They reportedly didn't bother to change up their Media Access Control address when communicating over the group's wireless network, which helped the FBI trace them. They also made a series of classic blunders including betraying a cash drop site and leaving a password written down inside one of their homes.

	It's worth wondering just how dumb the effort to recruit their kids really was, and a lesson for parents out there: Please don't recruit your kids as spies. But had it worked, and had more kids gone along, they might have been more successful than their parents were. But then again, that depends on your parents not blowing their cover because of a bunch of stupid mistakes.


http://gawker.com/5929300/russian-spies-wanted-to-turn-americas-kids-into-spy-kids
	Russian Spies Wanted to Turn America’s Kids Into Spy Kids
	Caity Weaver

	Of course, these same officials are also possibly fucking with the Journal (if they're intelligence officials at all — maybe they're also Russian spies?) when they describe a melodramatic scene allegedly captured by surveillance equipment, in which Foley discusses with mom and pop his decision to enter the family business:

		"At the end of the discussion with his parents…the young man stood up and saluted ‘Mother Russia.' He also agreed to travel to Russia to begin formal espionage training."

	How's that dork ever going to become a spy? You gotta know how to play it real cool and smooth if you want to be a part of this crazy spy world, baby.

	For the record, a lawyer for Tim Foley, the most bad-ass kid who ever lived on anyone's hall sophomore year, calls these crap-sounding accusations "crap" and says it would have been too risky for his parents to reveal their secret lives to their putz of a son.


And one of the spies, Vicky Peleaz, was a famous journalist:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Vicky_Pel%C3%A1ez
	Peláez was "one of the few women journalists in Peru in the 1980s" and established a reputation as a "colorful reporter" for Frecuencia Latina (Channel 2) in Lima. The Peruvian magazine Teleguia called her "the most aggressive journalist on TV." The Peruvian CNN journalist Claudia Rebaza described Pelaez in this period as a controversial figure, known for interjecting herself into stories and for a sensationalist style.

	In 1984, Peláez and her cameraman Percy Raborg were kidnapped by the Peruvian rebel group Túpac Amaru Revolutionary Movement (MRTA). MRTA demanded Frecuencia Latina air a propaganda video in exchange for the release of Peláez and Raborg. The station agreed to air the video and Peláez and Raborg were released hours after airing. Raborg has since stated that Peláez was a willing participant in the kidnapping.


But other than this CNN bio (http://www.cnn.com/2010/CRIME/06/29/russian.spies.pelaez.profile/), the media mostly ignored Pelaez. But this is weird--it might be interesting, at least for awhile, that Anna Chapman is attractive, but isn't a famous journalist working as a Russian spy a big deal? Wouldn't it be interesting to see what a Russian spy posing as a journalist says?


https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=es&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.globalresearch.ca%2Fla-clase-dominante-en-guerra-sin-cuartel-contra-trump%2F5571687&edit-text=&act=url
	The ruling class at war without quarter against Trump

	By Vicky Peláez 

	The US ruling class and its European counterparts, promoters of globalization and the creation of a new economic order of 1% of the richest and most powerful, have seen US President Donald Trump as a symbol of nationalism and populism A challenge to their agenda at a planetary level.

	Since his election as president of the United States, world elites have engaged in a struggle against this new US leader and are determined not to allow the process of de-globalization that Donald Trump apparently intends to initiate with his slogan 'America First '. 

	So great is the fear of global neoliberal elites to Donald Trump's leadership of the world that from the day of his investiture managed to promote, with the help of the media at his service, protests in Washington and many other cities Including demonstrators. The popular Craiglist portal offered $ 1,500 a week to participate in the Stop 'Trump' protests. The Women's March in Washington was scheduled last year with three key demands: Gender Justice, Racial Justice and Economic Justice. It was also 'mysteriously' reoriented towards an anti-Trump agenda. What was interesting was that the women's demonstrations against Trump on January 21 were held in 670 American cities and 70 in the world.

	...In May 2016, during a CNN interview, Trump expressed skepticism about the vaccination of children, citing his own experience. "When [Barron] as a child was vaccinated, and a week later the fever went up and he felt very, very sick and now he is autistic." He said he was not against the vaccination, but demanded a previous and prolonged investigation of each vaccine. Well-known neurosurgeon Ben Garson also commented that "we are likely to get vaccinations in a very short period of time." Currently, this investigation has been ordered by the US president.


http://www.cnn.com/2010/CRIME/06/29/russian.spies.pelaez.profile/
	Vicky Pelaez, 55, is known for her leftist writings as a columnist for El Diario La Prensa, the largest Spanish-language daily newspaper in New York, as well as other publications. She has been a strident supporter of former Cuban President Fidel Castro and Venezuelan President Hugo Chavez.

	The website of the Centre for Research on Globalisation, a Canadian organization opposed to globalization and the "new world order," ran an article by Pelaez in 2008 about the use of U.S. prison inmates as cheap labor.


Instead, the little media coverage there was mostly focused on doubts that Peleaz was a spy and sympathy for her family:


https://www.justice.gov/opa/pr/ten-russian-agents-plead-guilty-and-are-be-removed-united-states
	The defendants Vicky Pelaez, Anna Chapman and Mikhail Semenko, who operated in this country under their true names, admitted that they are agents of the Russian Federation; and Chapman and Semenko admitted they are Russian citizens.


http://www.csmonitor.com/From-the-news-wires/2010/0709/Vicky-Pelaez-Can-someone-be-married-to-a-Russian-spy-and-not-know-it
	Vicky Pelaez: Can someone be married to a Russian spy and not know it?

	Vicky Pelaez: A willing spy for Russia or a wife deeply betrayed? Or something in between? Exactly what the Peruvian journalist knew is one of the more tantalizing mysteries to emerge from the Russian spy saga.

	By Jim Fitzgerald, AP National Writer Jocelyn Noveck, AP National Writer

	And the broader question: Was Pelaez, deported Thursday in a spy swap along with her husband, an enthusiastic secret agent — who like him, was willing to put her loyalty to Moscow over that of her children? Or was she a wife betrayed?


http://www.foxnews.com/us/2010/07/11/spy-kids-left-hanging-parents-deportation.html
	First, Juan Lazaro Jr. learned his father had a secret Russian name and was living a lie -- and that his mom was in cahoots.

	Then the moles of Yonkers, N.Y., copped a plea to avoid prison for espionage and left the 17-year-old piano virtuoso behind.

	Making matters worse, Lazaro Jr. and his 38-year-old brother, Waldo Mariscal, are so broke that they had to turn to the Red Cross for help in their bid to stay in New York, said their mother's lawyer, Carlos Moreno.

	"They have no money," said Lazaro Jr.'s aunt, Raquel Pelaez Ocampo Almeida.

	In a matter of just two weeks -- the time it took for his parents' deep-cover mission to get blown, earning them the boot -- the all-American teen's promising future has become scrambled and chaotic.
"I feel bad for the son. He got tangled up in the sins of others," said Kevin Virgilio, 26, who works at Mannes College The New School for Music, where Lazaro Jr. studies.

	The boy's mom, former El Diario La Prensa journalist Vicky Pelaez, appears destined for her native Peru following her deportation last week to Russia.


http://latindispatch.com/2010/07/14/alleged-spy-vicky-pelaez-plans-to-leave-russia-to-return-to-her-native-peru/
	Alleged Spy Vicky Pelaez Plans To Leave Russia To Return To Her Native Peru

	by Alison Bowenon July 14, 2010

	...Their two sons are reportedly broke and seeking help from the Red Cross after the government confiscated their house.

	“I feel bad for the son,” Kevin Virgilio, who works at the younger son’s music school, told The New York Post. “He got tangled up in the sins of others.”

	Rodriguez has said Pelaez didn’t know the extent of the spy ring’s activities, or even her husband’s real name.

	...While the other nine spies smiled during their court appearance, Pelaez cried, The Daily News reported, and she was the last to sign the agreement that ended with an American and Russian plane meeting in Vienna to swap spies.

	...Her son, Mariscal, told The Associated Press his family would reunite. “We have a nice adobe house in Peru that my mother built little by little,” he said.

	Authorities said Pelaez passed messages written in invisible ink and grabbed a bag of cash from a Russian contact in Peru.

	Federal Court Judge Ronald Ellis told NBC that her case is “more complicated,” because she used her real identity and didn’t seem to be a trained agent.


(Sympathy is good, but one would hope American journalists could show more of the same for our own:)


http://hotair.com/archives/2006/11/01/sy-hersh-us-army-in-iraq-is-the-most-violent-and-murderous-in-american-history/
	Sy Hersh: U.S. army in Iraq is the most “violent and murderous” in American history

	If Americans knew the full extent of U.S. criminal conduct, they would receive returning Iraqi veterans as they did Vietnam veterans, Hersh said.

	“In Vietnam, our soldiers came back and they were reviled as baby killers, in shame and humiliation,” he said. “It isn’t happening now, but I will tell you – there has never been an [American] army as violent and murderous as our army has been in Iraq.”


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Valerie_Plame#.22Plamegate.22
	On July 14, 2003, Robert Novak, journalist for The Washington Post, using information obtained from Richard Armitage at the United States Department of State, effectively ended Valerie Plame's career with the CIA (from which she later resigned in December 2005) by revealing in his column her identity as a CIA operative.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/20/world/asia/china-cia-spies-espionage.html
	Those who rejected the mole theory attributed the losses to sloppy American tradecraft at a time when the Chinese were becoming better at monitoring American espionage activities in the country.

	...Still, the Chinese picked off more and more of the agency’s spies, continuing through 2011 and into 2012. 


It's a shame the media ignored Peleaz--seeing the coverage of our election by a confirmed Russian spy is fascinating:


https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=es&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=https%3A%2F%2Fmundo.sputniknews.com%2Ffirmas%2F201603171057745687-trump-candidato-republicanos%2F&edit-text=&act=url
	Donald Trump The Republican Candidate Frankenstein
	19:38 17.03.2016
	Vicky Pelaez 

 	In Trump's case all the forecasts have failed so far, as this populist insurgent is producing a tsunami in the Republican Party, destroying the core of elitist power and advancing as a flattening towards the presidential nomination.

	Neoconservative Republicans and even neoliberal Democrats are all so scared that they have created the Stop Trump movement. American writer and politician Ben Carson, who endorsed Trump and is projected as his vice presidential candidate, denounces permanent attacks on Donald by globalizing politicians who try to discredit him and distort his agenda. According to Carsen, more than 40 million dollars have already been spent on this dirty campaign, he further notes that the Popular Action Committees (PACs), which have unlimited capacity to fund candidates who agree to promote the agenda established by The richest and most powerful in the United States, announced an all-out war against the populist candidate.

	...Such is the desperation of the Republican power circle over Trump's possible victory in the nomination of his candidacy, which recently 116 members of the Republican National Security Commission threatened to endorse the ranks of Hillary Clinton. The neoconservatives and their neoliberal colleagues, who are actually the "same horse with a different mount," are preparing plans to stop Trump and not allow his nomination. They do not want any alteration in their globalizing agenda, they want to stay in the "era", defined by the scholar of the Michoacana University of San Nicolás de Hidalgo, Teresa da Cunha Lopes, "of the politics of 'posture', that is, when politicians And the supposed experts who serve them never feel compelled to acknowledge the uncomfortable data and never abandon any argument however overwhelming the evidence against wrong. "

	...For Rinear, if Trump keeps pushing forward, the core of real power will pressure him to withdraw, or compromise, or simply replace him during the Republican Convention by a politician like Mitt Romney. Donald Trump knows all this perfectly and already stated yesterday in an interview with CNN that "there could be riots. I can imagine, many, many millions of people" if not nominated by the Republican Party.

	Meanwhile, the media war against Trump received the support of European elites who labeled him "a Berlusconi with nuclear weapons" and even Russian liberals prefer Hillary Clinton, pardoning their Russophobia, instead of trying to understand Donald Trump Wants to enter into a dialogue with Vladimir Putin and to whom he praised his participation in the solution of the war in Syria.

	American President Theodore Roosevelt (1901-1909) once commented on the existence of an invisible government, noting that "the first task of the art of governing is to destroy this invisible government, to contaminate this terrible alliance between corrupt businesses and corrupt politicians" . So far no one has succeeded in doing so except for certain certain attempts in the socialist countries. Capitalism, and especially in its cynically sophisticated neoliberal form, is nourished by corruption on a global scale and can not advance its interests without the existence of an invisible government that, as time passes, becomes increasingly globalized. 


"Donald Trump to Destroy U.S. Elitist Power, Flatten Presidency: Russian Spy" How's that for a headline?

Although, according to "experts" and other public figures, Russia's influence operations are not conducted by spies, but by social media trolls, "profiteers," and satirists "looking for laughs:"


http://www.thedailybeast.com/inside-russias-fake-news-playbook
	Inside Russia’s Fake News Playbook

	Clint Watts is testifying Thursday before the Senate’s armed services committee on how Russia became the kings of black propaganda. Here’s what he told the senators.

	Clint Watts

	1) How does Russian nation state influence via social media differ from other influence efforts on social media?

	As I discussed on March 30, 2017, Russia, over the past three years, has conducted the most successful influence campaign in history using the Internet and more importantly social media to access and manipulate foreign audiences. Russia and other nation states are not the only influencers in social media. Profiteers pushing false or salacious stories for ad revenue, political campaigns running advertisements and satirists looking for laughs also seek to influence audiences during elections, but their online behavior manifests differently from that of Russia. Russia’s hacking may be covert, but their employment of kompromat ultimately reveals their overt influence campaigns. Furthermore, Russian influence performs a full range of actions to achieve their objectives that distinguish them from other influence efforts.


But there would be little reason for them not to use their spies for influence operations--that's what they're for--and by most indications, they have more then enough: 


http://www.washingtonpost.com/wp-dyn/content/article/2010/07/12/AR2010071205341.html
	Two questions: Have we caught all the "illegals" that Russia's security service, the SVR, has planted over the years in the United States? And will the SVR press the reset button with the Obama administration and not send additional "illegals" to this country?

	In a background briefing for reporters on Thursday, a senior administration official familiar with the Justice Department's assessment of the situation described how the 10 who were arrested as "sleeper agents" had been under investigation for years. The official added: "We have effectively shut down the illegal program here."

	Other sources in the law enforcement and intelligence communities do not share that view, although, of course, they will not say so publicly.

	As one former senior intelligence official put it, "How would we know?"

	The Russians have used "illegals" in their espionage activities since the October 1917 revolution. As the FBI put it in the June 27 complaint, "illegals" are provided false identities and documents, obtain citizenship or legal resident permits of target countries, and "pursue degrees at target-country universities, obtain employment, and join relevant professional associations." They "work to hide all connections between themselves and Russia, even as they act at the direction and under the control of the SVR." Gathering data on people who can later be recruited as spies is a primary goal, instead of stealing secrets themselves. In the trade, they are called spotters.

	 ...The best public indication of the extent of Moscow's efforts comes from the late Sergei Tretyakov, the former Russian intelligence officer who under the guise of a press officer at the U.N. Mission ran espionage operations in New York City from 1995 to 2000. He served the last three of those years as a double agent for the FBI until he defected to the United States. As Tretyakov told author Pete Earley in the book "Comrade J," at one time he had more than 60 SVR officers working inside the United Nations and more than 160 contacts made up of illegals, outright spies, and other people who knowingly or unknowingly could supply information useful to Russia.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/06/01/russia-spies-espionage-trump-239003
	Russia escalates spy games after years of U.S. neglect

	By Ali Watkins

	06/01/2017

	...“They’ve just got so many bodies,” the first intelligence official said of the Russians. “It’s not about what we know [is happening]. It’s about what we don’t know.”


http://www.nytimes.com/1985/06/16/us/us-frustrated-in-efforts-to-counter-soviet-spying.html
	U.S. FRUSTRATED IN EFFORTS TO COUNTER SOVIET SPYING

	June 16, 1985

	...While the Government has debated the number of counterintelligence agents it needs, the Soviet Union has improved and expanded its intelligence operations here, senior officials said.
 
	Over the last decade, intelligence officials said, Moscow has more than doubled the number of intelligence officers assigned to the United States while at the same time broadening their operations to focus on American technology and military industries.
 
	In the past Soviet officers worked chiefly in only four or five major cities, including New York, Washington and San Francisco. But Mr. O'Malley said they now operate nationwide.
 
	...Most intelligence officials say they believe that American intelligence operations are better than those of the K.G.B. but that the K.G.B. does not require as much skill to operate effectively in America's open society
	
	...The last group consists of undercover Soviet officers who enter the country illegally, take up residence as American citizens and try to blend into American society.
 
	These ''illegals,'' report directly to Moscow, intelligence officials say, and try to find jobs that give them access to sensitive information. The most famous of these was Col. Rudolf Abel, a Soviet officer who ran a successful spy network in the 1950's.
 
	Admiral Turner, the former C.I.A. Director, said, ''I suspect there are a sizable number of illegals in the United States,'' although intelligence officals say no one knows for sure.
 
	For several years the Congressional intelligence committees have been struggling to increase the number of F.B.I. agents assigned to the counterintelligence office.
 
	''For the last three or four years, our intelligence committee has increased the F.C.I. manpower above what the Administration asked for,'' said Senator Leahy, the committee's vice chairman, referring to the foreign counterintelligence office. Still, he added, ''There are nowhere near enough agents.'


http://www.nytimes.com/books/first/a/andrew-sword.html
	THE MITROKHIN ARCHIVE

    ...The facts, however, are far more sensational even than the story dismissed as impossible by the SVR. The KGB defector had brought with him to Britain details not of a few hundred but of thousands of Soviet agents and intelligence officers in all parts of the globe, some of them "illegals" living under deep cover abroad, disguised as foreign citizens.


http://www.businessinsider.com/here-was-the-fbis-secret-plan-in-case-nuclear-war-broke-out-2015-1
	Jan. 30, 2015

    The United States government made extreme, top-secret plans for preserving national security in the event of a nuclear attack during the Cold War, according to documents recently released to transparency journalism organization MuckRock.


https://d3gn0r3afghep.cloudfront.net/foia_files/1240819-0_-_066-HQ-19017_-_Section_01.PDF
	Emergency Detention Program - The Federal Bureau of Investigation schedules for apprehension individuals whose affiliations with subversive organizations are so pronounced that their continued liberty in the event of a national emergency would present a serious threat to the internal security of the country. As of April 17, 1956, 12,949 individuals were scheduled for apprehension in an emergency.


https://www.nytimes.com/interactive/2017/05/09/us/politics/document-FBI-Comey-Testimony-Clarifying-Letter.html
	In addition, the Director's testimony concerning the number of counterterrorism investigations involving refugees appears to have been misrepresented. During his testimony, Director Comey stated the FBI has approximately 1,000 investigations of suspected homegrown violent extremists (HVE) and another 1,000 investigations of individuals who are suspected of connections to ISIS. These 2,000 investigations are a subset of the FBI's total number of counterterrorism investigations, which is classified, and which involve subjects from a variety of terrorist groups.
